Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.090

Civil action for damages—Treble damages authorized—Action by governmental entities.

Any person who is injured in his or her business or property by a violation of RCW 19.86.020, 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, or any person so injured because he or she refuses to accede to a proposal for an arrangement which, if consummated, would be in violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, may bring a civil action in superior court to enjoin further violations, to recover the actual damages sustained by him or her, or both, together with the costs of the suit, including a reasonable attorney's fee. In addition, the court may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages up to an amount not to exceed three times the actual damages sustained: PROVIDED, That such increased damage award for violation of RCW 19.86.020 may not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such person may bring a civil action in the district court to recover his or her actual damages, except for damages which exceed the amount specified in RCW 3.66.020, and the costs of the suit, including reasonable attorney's fees. The district court may, in its discretion, increase the award of damages to an amount not more than three times the actual damages sustained, but such increased damage award shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars. For the purpose of this section, "person" includes the counties, municipalities, and all political subdivisions of this state.

Whenever the state of Washington is injured, directly or indirectly, by reason of a violation of RCW 19.86.030, 19.86.040, 19.86.050, or 19.86.060, it may sue therefor in superior court to recover the actual damages sustained by it, whether direct or indirect, and to recover the costs of the suit including a reasonable attorney's fee.

[ 2009 c 371 s 1; 2007 c 66 s 2; 1987 c 202 s 187; 1983 c 288 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 26 s 2; 1961 c 216 s 9.]

NOTES:

Application—2009 c 371: "This act applies to all causes of action that accrue on or after July 26, 2009." [ 2009 c 371 s 3.]

Effective date—2007 c 66: See note following RCW 19.86.080.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Short title—Purposes—1983 c 288: "This act may be cited as the antitrust/consumer protection improvements act. Its purposes are to strengthen public and private enforcement of the unfair business practices-consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, and to repeal the unfair practices act, chapter 19.90 RCW, in order to eliminate a statute which is unnecessary in light of the provisions and remedies of chapter 19.86 RCW. In repealing chapter 19.90 RCW, it is the intent of the legislature that chapter 19.86 RCW should continue to provide appropriate remedies for predatory pricing and other pricing practices which constitute violations of federal antitrust law." [ 1983 c 288 s 1.]